California statutes. Civil Code
(5) A vote made by electronic secret ballot is effective when it is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by an inspector or
 inspectors of elections.

(6) A vote made by electronic secret ballot shall not be revoked.

(7) If the association does not have a member’s email address required to vote by electronic secret ballot by the time at which ballots are to be distributed, the association shall send the member a written secret ballot.

(8) For purposes of determining a quorum, a member voting electronically pursuant to this subdivision shall be counted as a member in attendance at the meeting. Once the quorum is established, a substantive vote of the members shall not be taken on any issue other than the issues specifically identified in the electronic vote.

(9) As used in this
 subdivision, “electronic secret ballot” means a ballot conducted by an electronic voting system that ensures the secrecy and integrity of a ballot pursuant to the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.   (AB 2159)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5110.

(a) The association shall select an independent third party or parties as an inspector of elections. The number of inspectors of elections shall be one or three.

(b) For the purposes of this section, an independent third party includes, but is not limited to, a volunteer poll worker with the county registrar of voters, a licensee of the California Board of Accountancy, or a notary public. An independent third party may be a member, but may not be a director or a candidate for director or be related to a director or to a candidate for director. An independent third party may not be a person, business entity, or subdivision of a business entity who is currently employed or under contract to
 the association for any compensable services other than serving as an inspector of elections.

(c) The inspector or inspectors of elections shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine the number of memberships entitled to vote and the voting power of each.

(2) Determine the authenticity, validity, and effect of proxies, if any.

(3) Receive ballots.

(4) Ensure compliance with all of the following, if the inspector or inspectors of elections conducts an election by electronic secret ballot pursuant to Section 5105:

(A) Each member
 voting by electronic secret ballot shall be provided with all of the following:

(i) A method to authenticate the member’s identity to the internet-based voting system.

(ii) A method to transmit an electronic secret ballot to the internet-based voting system that ensures the secrecy and integrity of each ballot.

(iii) A method to confirm, at least 30 days before the voting deadline, that the member’s electronic device can successfully communicate with the internet-based voting system.

(B) Any internet-based voting system that is utilized shall have the ability to accomplish all of the following:

(i) Authenticate the member’s identity.

(ii) Authenticate the validity of each electronic secret ballot to ensure that the electronic secret ballot is not altered in transit.

(iii) Transmit a receipt from the internet-based voting system to each member who casts an electronic secret ballot.

(iv) Permanently separate any authenticating or identifying information from the electronic secret ballot, rendering it impossible to connect an election ballot to a specific member.

(v) Store and keep electronic secret ballots accessible to elections officials or their authorized representatives for recount, inspection, and review purposes.

(5) Hear and determine all challenges and questions in any way arising out of or in connection with the right to vote.

(6) Count and tabulate all votes.

(7) Determine when the polls shall close, consistent with the governing documents.

(8) Determine the tabulated results of the election.

(9) Perform any acts as may be proper to conduct the election with fairness to all members in accordance with this article, the Corporations Code, and all applicable rules of the association regarding the conduct of the election that are not in conflict with this article.

(d) An inspector or inspectors of elections shall perform all duties impartially, in good faith, to the best of the inspector or inspectors of elections’ ability, as expeditiously as is practical, and in a manner that protects the interest of all members of the association. If there are three inspectors of elections, the decision or act of a majority shall be effective in all respects as the decision or act of all. Any report made by the inspector or inspectors of elections is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.   (AB 2159)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5115.

(a) An association shall provide general notice of the procedure and deadline for submitting a nomination at least 30 days before any deadline for submitting a nomination. Individual notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 4040 if individual notice is requested by a member. This subdivision shall only apply to elections of directors and to recall elections.

(b) For elections of directors and for recall elections, an association shall provide general notice of all of the following at least 30 days before the ballots are distributed:

(1) The date and time by which, and the physical address where, ballots are to be returned by mail or handed to the inspector or inspectors of elections.

(2) If the association allows for voting in an election by electronic secret ballot as provided for in Section 5105, the date and time by which electronic secret ballots are to be transmitted to the internet-based voting system and preliminary instructions on how to vote by electronic secret ballot upon commencement of the voting period.

(3) The date, time, and location of the meeting at which a quorum will be determined, if the association’s governing documents require a quorum, and at which ballots will be counted.

(4) The list of all candidates’ names that will appear on the ballot.

(5) Individual notice of the above paragraphs shall be delivered pursuant to Section 4040 if individual notice is requested by a member.

(6) (A) If the association’s governing documents require a quorum for an election of directors, a statement that the association may call a reconvened meeting to be held at least 20 days after a scheduled election if the required quorum is not reached, at which time the quorum of the membership to elect directors will be 20 percent of the association’s members, voting in person, by proxy, or by secret ballot.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if the governing documents of the association provide for a quorum lower than 20 percent.

(c) Ballots and two preaddressed envelopes with instructions on how to return ballots shall be mailed by first-class mail or delivered by the association to every member not less than 30 days prior to the deadline for voting, unless an association conducts an election by
 electronic secret ballot as provided for in Section 5105, in which case only members who will vote by written secret ballot pursuant to Section 5105 shall be mailed or delivered the ballots and envelopes. In order to preserve confidentiality, a voter may not be identified by name, address, or lot, parcel, or unit number on the ballot. The association shall use as a model those procedures used by California counties for ensuring confidentiality of vote by mail ballots, including both of the following:

(1) The ballot itself is not signed by the voter, but is inserted into an envelope that is sealed. This envelope is inserted into a second envelope that is sealed. In the upper left-hand corner of the second envelope, the voter shall sign the voter’s name, indicate the voter’s name, and indicate the address or separate interest identifier that entitles the voter to vote.

(2) The
 second envelope is addressed to the inspector or inspectors of elections, who will be tallying the votes. The envelope may be mailed or delivered by hand to a location specified by the inspector or inspectors of elections. The member may request a receipt for delivery.

(d) (1) A quorum shall be required only if so stated in the governing documents or other provisions of law. If a quorum is required by the governing documents, each ballot received by the inspector or inspectors of elections shall be treated as a member present at a meeting for purposes of establishing a quorum.

(2) For an election of directors of an association, and in the absence of meeting a quorum as required by the association’s governing documents or Section 7512 of the Corporations Code, unless a lower quorum for a reconvened meeting is authorized by the association’s governing
 documents, the association may adjourn the meeting to a date at least 20 days after the adjourned meeting, at which time the quorum required for purposes of a reconvened meeting to elect directors shall be 20 percent of the association’s members, voting in person, by proxy, or by secret ballot.

(3) No less than 15 days prior to the date of the reconvened meeting described in paragraph (2), the association shall provide general notice of the reconvened meeting, which shall include:

(A) The date, time, and location of the meeting.

(B) The list of all candidates.

(C) Unless the association’s governing documents provide for a lower quorum, a statement that 20 percent of the association’s members, voting in person, by proxy, or secret ballot will satisfy the
 quorum requirements for the election of directors at that reconvened meeting and that the ballots will be counted if a quorum is reached, if the association’s governing documents require a quorum.

(e) An association shall allow for cumulative voting using the secret ballot procedures provided in this section, if cumulative voting is provided for in the governing documents.

(f) Notwithstanding any contrary provision in the governing documents, except for the meeting to count the votes required in subdivision (a) of Section 5120, an election may be conducted entirely by mail, electronic secret ballot, or a combination of mail and electronic secret ballot, pursuant to Section 5105.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), in an election to approve an amendment of the governing documents, the
 text of the proposed amendment shall be delivered to the members with the ballot.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if an association conducts an election to approve an amendment of governing documents by electronic secret ballot, the association may deliver, by electronic means, the text of the proposed amendment to those members who vote by electronic secret ballot, pursuant to Section 5105. The association shall also deliver a written copy of the text of the proposed amendment to those members upon request and without charge. If a member votes by written secret ballot, pursuant to Section 5105, the association shall deliver a written copy of the text of the proposed amendment to the member with the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 37.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5120.

(a) All votes shall be counted and tabulated by the inspector or inspectors of elections, or the designee of the inspector or inspectors of elections, in public at a properly noticed open meeting of the board or members. Any candidate or other member of the association may witness the counting and tabulation of the votes. A person, including a member of the association or an employee of the management company, shall not open or otherwise review any ballot before the time and place at which the ballots are counted and tabulated. The inspector or inspectors of elections, or the designee of the inspector or inspectors of elections, may verify the member’s information and signature on the outer envelope prior to the meeting at which ballots are tabulated.
 Once a secret ballot is received by the inspector or inspectors of elections, it shall be irrevocable.

(b) The tabulated results of the election shall be promptly reported to the board and shall be recorded in the minutes of the next meeting of the board and shall be available for review by members of the association. Within 15 days of the election, the board shall give general notice pursuant to Section 4045 of the tabulated results of the election.

(c) A person, including a member of the association or an employee of the management company, shall not open or otherwise review any tally sheet of votes cast by electronic secret ballots before the time and place at which the ballots are counted and tabulated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 383, Sec. 4.   (AB 2159)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5125.

The sealed ballots, signed voter envelopes, voter list, proxies, candidate registration list, and tally sheet of votes cast by electronic secret ballot shall at all times be in the custody of the inspector or inspectors of elections or at a location designated by the inspector or inspectors until after the tabulation of the vote, and until the time allowed by Section 5145 for challenging the election has expired, at which time custody shall be transferred to the association. If there is a recount or other challenge to the election process, the inspector or inspectors of elections shall, upon written request, make the ballots and the tally sheet of votes cast by electronic secret ballot available for inspection and review by an association member or the member’s
 authorized representative. Any recount shall be conducted in a manner that preserves the confidentiality of the vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 383, Sec. 5.   (AB 2159)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5130.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Proxy” means a written authorization signed by a member or the authorized representative of the member that gives another member or members the power to vote on behalf of that member.

(2) “Signed” means the placing of the member’s name on the proxy (whether by
manual signature, typewriting, telegraphic transmission, or otherwise) by the member or authorized representative of the member.

(b) Proxies shall not be construed or used in lieu of a ballot. An association may use proxies if permitted or required by the bylaws of the association and if those proxies meet the requirements of this article, other laws, and the governing documents, but the association shall not be required to prepare or distribute proxies pursuant to this article.

(c) Any instruction given in a proxy issued for an election that directs the manner in which the proxyholder is to cast the vote shall be set forth on a separate page of the proxy that can be detached and given to the proxyholder to retain. The proxyholder shall cast the member’s vote by secret ballot. The proxy may be revoked by the member prior to the receipt of the ballot by the inspector of elections
as described in Section 7613 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5135.

(a) Association funds shall not be used for campaign purposes in connection with any association board election. Funds of the association shall not be used for campaign purposes in connection with any other association election except to the extent necessary to comply with duties of the association imposed by law.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “campaign purposes” includes, but is not limited
to, the following:

(1) Expressly advocating the election or defeat of any candidate that is on the association election ballot.

(2) Including the photograph or prominently featuring the name of any candidate on a communication from the association or its board, excepting the ballot, ballot materials, or a communication that is legally required, within 30 days of an election. This is not a campaign purpose if the communication is one for which subdivision (a) of Section 5105 requires that equal access be provided to another candidate or advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5145.

(a) A member of an association may bring a civil action for declaratory or equitable relief for a violation of this article by the association, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, restitution, or a combination thereof, within one year of the date that the inspector or inspectors of elections notifies the board and membership of the election results or the cause of action accrues, whichever is later. If a member establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the election procedures of this article, or the adoption of and adherence to rules provided by Article 5 (commencing with Section 4340) of Chapter 3, were not followed, a court shall void any results of the election unless the association
 establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the association’s noncompliance with this article or the election operating rules did not affect the results of the election. The findings of the court shall be stated in writing as part of the record. 

(b) A member who prevails in a civil action to enforce the member’s rights pursuant to this article shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs, and the court may impose a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, except that each identical violation shall be subject to only one penalty if the violation affects each member of the association equally. A prevailing association shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation. If a
 member prevails in a civil action brought in small claims court, the member shall be awarded court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred for consulting an attorney in connection with this civil action. 

(c) A cause of action under subdivision (a) may be brought in either the superior court or, if the amount of the demand does not exceed the jurisdictional amount of the small claims court, in small claims court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 848, Sec. 6.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Record Inspection [5200. - 5240.]

5200.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Association records” means all of the following:

(1) Any financial document required to be provided to a member in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5300) or in Sections 5565 and 5810.

(2) Any financial document or statement required to be provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4525) of Chapter 4.

(3) Interim financial statements, periodic or as compiled, containing any of the following:

(A) Balance sheet.

(B) Income and expense statement.

(C) Budget comparison.

(D) General ledger. A “general ledger” is a report that shows all transactions that occurred in an association account over a specified period of time.

The records described in this paragraph shall be prepared in accordance with an accrual or modified accrual basis of accounting.

(4) Executed contracts not otherwise privileged under law.

(5) Written board approval of vendor or contractor proposals or invoices.

(6) State and federal tax returns.

(7) Reserve account balances and records of payments made from reserve accounts.

(8) Agendas and minutes of meetings of the members, the board, and any committees appointed by the board pursuant to Section 7212 of the Corporations Code; excluding, however, minutes and other information from executive sessions of the board as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4900).

(9) Membership lists, including name, property address, mailing address, email address, as collected by the association in accordance with Section 4041 where applicable, but not including information for members who have opted out pursuant to Section 5220.

(10) Check registers.

(11) The governing documents.

(12) An accounting prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5520.

(13) An “enhanced association record” as defined in subdivision (b).

(14) “Association election materials” as defined in subdivision (c).

(15) All inspector’s reports compiled pursuant to Section 5551.

(b) “Enhanced association records” means invoices, receipts, and canceled checks for payments made by the association, purchase orders approved by the association, bank account statements for bank
 accounts in which assessments are deposited or withdrawn, credit card statements for credit cards issued in the name of the association, statements for services rendered, and
 reimbursement requests submitted to the association.

(c) “Association election materials” means returned ballots, signed voter envelopes, the voter list of names, parcel numbers, and voters to whom ballots were to be sent, proxies, the candidate registration list, and the tally sheet of votes cast by electronic secret ballot. Signed voter envelopes may be inspected but may not be copied. An association shall maintain association election materials for one year after the date of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 516, Sec. 3.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

(a) The association shall make available association records for the time periods and within the timeframes provided in Section 5210 for inspection and copying by a member of the association, or the member’s designated representative.

(b) A member of the association may designate another person to inspect and copy the specified association records on the member’s behalf. The member shall make this
designation in writing.

(c) The association shall make the specified association records available for inspection and copying in the association’s business office within the common interest development.

(d) If the association does not have a business office within the development, the association shall make the specified association records available for inspection and copying at a place agreed to by the requesting member and the association.

(e) If the association and the requesting member cannot agree upon a place for inspection and copying pursuant to subdivision (d) or if the requesting member submits a written request directly to the association for copies of specifically identified records, the association may satisfy the requirement to make the association records available for inspection and copying by
delivering copies of the specifically identified records to the member by individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040 within the timeframes set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 5210.

(f) The association may bill the requesting member for the direct and actual cost of copying and mailing requested documents. The association shall inform the member of the amount of the copying and mailing costs, and the member shall agree to pay those costs, before copying and sending the requested documents.

(g) In addition to the direct and actual costs of copying and mailing, the association may bill the requesting member an amount not in excess of ten dollars ($10) per hour, and not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) total per written request, for the time actually and reasonably involved in redacting an enhanced association record. If the enhanced association record includes a
reimbursement request, the person submitting the reimbursement request shall be solely responsible for removing all personal identification information from the request. The association shall inform the member of the estimated costs, and the member shall agree to pay those costs, before retrieving the requested documents.

(h) Requesting parties shall have the option of receiving specifically identified records by electronic transmission or machine-readable storage media as long as those records can be transmitted in a redacted format that does not allow the records to be altered. The cost of duplication shall be limited to the direct cost of producing the copy of a record in that electronic format. The association may deliver specifically identified records by electronic transmission or machine-readable storage media as long as those records can be transmitted in a redacted format that prevents the records from being altered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5210.

(a) Association records are subject to member inspection for the following time periods:

(1) For the current fiscal year and for each of the previous two fiscal years.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), minutes of member and board meetings are subject to inspection permanently. If a committee has decisionmaking authority, minutes of the meetings of that committee shall be made available commencing January 1, 2007, and shall thereafter be permanently subject to inspection.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), all inspector’s reports compiled pursuant to Section 5551 shall
 be subject to inspection for the time period required by subdivision (i) of Section 5551.

(b) When a member properly requests access to association records, access to the requested records shall be granted within the following time periods:

(1) Association records prepared during the current fiscal year, within 10 business days following the association’s receipt of the request.

(2) Association records prepared during the previous two fiscal years, within 30 calendar days following the association’s receipt of the request.

(3) Any record or statement available pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4525) of Chapter 4, Article 7 (commencing
 with Section 5300), Section 5565, or Section 5810, within the timeframe specified therein.

(4) Minutes of member and board meetings, within the timeframe specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4950.

(5) Minutes of meetings of committees with decisionmaking authority for meetings commencing on or after January 1, 2007, within 15 calendar days following approval.

(6) Membership list, within the timeframe specified in Section 8330 of the Corporations Code.

(c) There shall be no liability pursuant to this article for an association that fails to retain records for the periods specified in subdivision (a) that were created prior to January 1,
 2006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 516, Sec. 4.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5215.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the association may withhold or redact information from the association records if any of the following are true:

(1) The release of the information is reasonably likely to lead to identity theft. For the purposes of this section, “identity theft” means the unauthorized use of another person’s personal identifying information to obtain credit, goods,
services, money, or property. Examples of information that may be withheld or redacted pursuant to this paragraph include bank account numbers of members or vendors, social security or tax identification numbers, and check, stock, and credit card numbers.

(2) The release of the information is reasonably likely to lead to fraud in connection with the association.

(3) The information is privileged under law. Examples include documents subject to attorney-client privilege or relating to litigation in which the association is or may become involved, and confidential settlement agreements.

(4) The release of the information is reasonably likely to compromise the privacy of an individual member of the association.

(5) The information contains any of the
following:

(A) Records of goods or services provided a la carte to individual members of the association for which the association received monetary consideration other than assessments.

(B) Records of disciplinary actions, collection activities, or payment plans of members other than the member requesting the records.

(C) Any person’s personal identification information, including, without limitation, social security number, tax identification number, driver’s license number, credit card account numbers, bank account number, and bank routing number.

(D) Minutes and other information from executive sessions of the board as described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4900), except for executed contracts not otherwise privileged. Privileged contracts
shall not include contracts for maintenance, management, or legal services.

(E) Personnel records other than the payroll records required to be provided under subdivision (b).

(F) Interior architectural plans, including security features, for individual homes.

(b) Except as provided by the attorney-client privilege, the association may not withhold or redact information concerning the compensation paid to employees, vendors, or contractors. Compensation information for individual employees shall be set forth by job classification or title, not by the employee’s name, social security number, or other personal information.

(c) No association, officer, director, employee, agent, or volunteer of an association shall be liable for damages to a member of the
association or any third party as the result of identity theft or other breach of privacy because of the failure to withhold or redact that member’s information under this section unless the failure to withhold or redact the information was intentional, willful, or negligent.

(d) If requested by the requesting member, an association that denies or redacts records shall provide a written explanation specifying the legal basis for withholding or redacting the requested records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of a member of an association who is an active participant in the Safe at Home program, the association shall do both of the following:

(1) Accept and use the address designated by the Secretary of State as the Safe at Home participant’s substitute address under the Safe at Home program for all association communications.

(2) Withhold or redact information that would reveal the name,
 community property address, or email address of the Safe at Home participant from both of the following:

(A) All resident community membership lists, including mailbox bank listings, resident directories, electronic keypads, unit property numbers, and internet web portal accounts.

(B) Any membership list that will be shared with other members of the association.

(b) An association shall keep member participation in the Safe at Home program confidential.

(c) For
 purposes of this section:

(1) “Community property address” means the address of the member’s property within the community governed by the association.

(2) “Safe at Home participant” means a person certified as a program participant in the Safe at Home program.

(3) “Safe at Home program” means the address confidentiality program established pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 151, Sec. 2.   (AB 611)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5220.

A member of the association may opt out of the sharing of that member’s name, property address, email address, and mailing address by notifying the association in writing that the member prefers to be contacted via the alternative process described in subdivision (c) of Section 8330 of the Corporations Code. This opt-out shall remain in effect until changed by the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 640, Sec. 7.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5225.

A member requesting the membership list shall state the purpose for which the list is requested which purpose shall be reasonably related to the requester’s interest as a member. If the association reasonably believes that the information in the list will be used for another purpose, it may deny the member access to the list. If the request is denied, in any subsequent action brought by the member under Section 5235, the association shall have the burden to prove that the member would
have allowed use of the information for purposes unrelated to the member’s interest as a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5230.

(a) The association records, and any information from them, may not be sold, used for a commercial purpose, or used for any other purpose not reasonably related to a member’s interest as a member. An association may bring an action against any person who violates this article for injunctive relief and for actual damages to the association caused by the violation.

(b) This article may not be construed to limit the right of an association to damages for misuse of information obtained from the association records pursuant to this article or to limit the right of an association to injunctive relief to stop the misuse of this information.

(c) (1) An association or its managing agent shall not do either of the following:

(A) Sell a member’s personal information for any purpose without the consent of the member.

(B) Transmit a member’s personal information to a third party without the consent of the member unless required to do so by law, including, but not limited to, Article 5 (commencing with Section 5200).

(2) A member may bring an action against an association that violates this subdivision for injunctive relief and actual damages caused by the violation. A member shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, in a successful action to enforce the member’s rights under this
 subdivision.

(d) An association shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, in a successful action to enforce its rights under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 640, Sec. 8.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5235.

(a) A member may bring an action to enforce that member’s right to inspect and copy the association records. If a court finds that the association unreasonably withheld access to the association records, the court shall award the member reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and may assess a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for the denial of each separate written request.

(b) A cause of action under this section may be brought in small claims court if the amount of the demand does not exceed the jurisdiction of that court.

(c) A prevailing association may recover any costs if the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

5240.

(a) As applied to an association and its members, the provisions of this article are intended to supersede the provisions of Sections 8330 and 8333 of the Corporations Code to the extent those sections are inconsistent.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), members of the association shall have access to association records,
including accounting books and records and membership lists, in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 8330) of Chapter 13 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(c) This article applies to any community service organization or similar entity that is related to the association, and to any nonprofit entity that provides services to a common interest development under a declaration of trust. This article shall operate to give a member of the organization or entity a right to inspect and copy the records of that organization or entity equivalent to that granted to association members by this article.

(d) This article shall not apply to any common interest development in which separate interests are being offered for sale by a subdivider under the authority of a public report issued by the Bureau of Real Estate so long as the subdivider or all
subdividers offering those separate interests for sale, or any employees of those subdividers or any other person who receives direct or indirect compensation from any of those subdividers, comprise a majority of the directors. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this article shall apply to that common interest development no later than 10 years after the close of escrow for the first sale of a separate interest to a member of the general public pursuant to the public report issued for the first phase of the development.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 54.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Addition and amendment operative January 1, 2014, by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 3, and Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 543.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Recordkeeping [5260. - 5260.]

5260.

To be effective, any of the following requests shall be delivered in writing to the association, pursuant to Section 4035:

(a) A request to change the member’s information in the association membership list.

(b) A request to add or remove a second email or mailing address for delivery of individual notices to the member, pursuant to Section 4040.

(c) A request for individual delivery of general notices to the member, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4045, or a request to cancel a prior request for individual delivery of general notices.

(d) A request to opt out of the membership list pursuant to Section 5220, or a request to cancel a prior request to opt out of the membership list.

(e) A request to receive a full copy of a specified annual budget report or annual policy statement pursuant to Section 5320.

(f) A request to receive all reports in full, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5320, or a request to cancel a prior request to receive all reports in full.

(g) A request to opt out of or opt into electronically voting by electronic secret
 ballot, pursuant to Section 5105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 383, Sec. 7.   (AB 2159)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Annual Reports [5300. - 5320.]

5300.

(a) Notwithstanding a contrary provision in the governing documents, an association shall distribute an annual budget report 30 to 90 days before the end of its fiscal year.

(b) Unless the governing documents impose more stringent standards, the annual budget report shall include all of the following information:

(1) A pro forma operating budget, showing the estimated revenue and expenses on an accrual basis.

(2) A summary of the association’s reserves, prepared pursuant to Section 5565.
